Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 3. Contract Review; Contract Carriage Certificate; Open Seasons.

Sec. 42.08.300.
Open seasons.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall include in its approved recourse tariff the procedures for conducting open seasons for uncommitted firm transportation service and for expansion. At a minimum, the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall publish reasonable public notice in advance of an open season. The notice shall contain the approved recourse tariff, the proposed form of the precedent agreement, the proposed form of the firm transportation service agreement, and other information sufficient to show the proposed route, capacity, operating pressures, in-service date, quality specifications, and other operating conditions that the pipeline carrier determines are relevant to an evaluation of the proposed service. The notice shall also state the methods for awarding capacity set out in the carrier’s recourse tariff and whether presubscription agreements have been executed. An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall provide a mechanism for providing additional relevant information requested by potential shippers.

An open season shall be conducted and firm transportation service shall be awarded without undue discrimination or preference. Presubscription agreements are subject to the methods for awarding capacity set out in the open season notice.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall conduct an open season for firm transportation service when it has existing uncommitted firm transportation capacity and has received a request for firm transportation capacity from one or more potential shippers that meet the pipeline’s creditworthiness requirements or after it has executed presubscription agreements for firm transportation.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall conduct an open season for an expansion of its pipeline system when it has received one or more requests for firm transportation service from potential shippers that meet the pipeline’s creditworthiness requirements and that, in the aggregate, would enable the expansion of the pipeline’s system on a commercially reasonable basis. An expansion of the pipeline system is not commercially reasonable if the expansion would cause the pipeline to be a competing natural gas pipeline project for purposes of AS 43.90.

A natural gas pipeline carrier may enter into presubscription agreements before the start of an open season, but not before an initial recourse tariff is approved.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall file revised recourse rates before conducting an open season under (c) and (d) of this section unless the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier filed revised recourse rates during the immediately preceding two-year period.

If executed precedent agreements are received by an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier, the carrier shall, within 10 days after accepting and executing the agreements, inform the public of the results through publication on the carrier’s Internet website and in a press release or other announcement to the media. The results made public must include the name of each prospective shipper, the amount of capacity allocated, and the period of commitment. If the carrier determines that the commitments received during the open season are not sufficient to permit the carrier to continue the development or construction of the in-state natural gas pipeline, the corporation shall report that to the commission within 30 days.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.310.
Transportation service.

Firm transportation service shall be made available only through a presubscription agreement, a recourse tariff, or an open season conducted in accordance with AS

42.08.300

.

The pipeline carrier shall offer a recourse tariff for firm transportation service. The rates included in the recourse tariff shall be determined on a cost-of-service basis and may be levelized over the depreciable life of the pipeline. The recourse tariff may not preclude the pipeline carrier from collecting rolled-in rates so long as the resulting rate for prior shippers does not exceed the initial maximum rate allowable under agreements for capacity.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier may contract to provide firm transportation service for rates and containing provisions different than those in the recourse tariff. For purposes of this subsection, “provisions” are limited to those terms and conditions that directly relate to the rate and do not include the general operating terms and conditions of the recourse tariff.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall provide interruptible transportation service through capacity not used for firm transportation service. An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall establish means for routinely advising potential shippers of the availability of interruptible transportation service and of uncommitted firm transportation capacity.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.320.
Review of certain contracts by the commission.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall submit each of its precedent agreements for firm transportation service and any substantial amendments to the commission. A precedent agreement negotiated with an entity that is not a public utility regulated by the commission may be filed under seal. Under AS

42.08.400

, the commission shall keep confidential a precedent agreement filed under seal. Submission of precedent agreements to the commission is permissible before construction of an in-state natural gas pipeline and before a request for certification under this chapter. In this subsection, “substantial amendment” means an amendment that materially changes a rate or term and condition of service.

In the review of a precedent agreement submitted under (a) of this section or a related contract submitted under AS

42.05.433(b)

or (c), the commission shall

conclude that a precedent agreement or related contract negotiated at arm’s length between the parties is just and reasonable unless the commission finds that unlawful market activity affected the rate or unfair dealing, such as fraud or duress, affected the formation of the contract;

review and may conduct an investigation and hearing to determine whether a contract submitted under (a) of this section is just and reasonable; the commission shall either approve the contract as presented or, if the commission finds that a contract is not just and reasonable, disapprove the contract; if the commission has not acted within 180 days after the submission of a contract, the contract shall be considered approved and shall take effect immediately; a contract that is approved or considered approved under this paragraph and the associated firm transportation service agreement are not subject to further review by the commission.

For purposes of (b)(1) of this section, and except as provided in (d) of this section, a precedent agreement or related contract is arm’s length

if it incorporates the approved recourse tariff; or

if it does not incorporate the approved recourse tariff,

the precedent agreement or related contract is between two state-owned parties;

the parties are not affiliated; or

if the parties are affiliated, the precedent agreement or related contract is substantially similar to a precedent agreement or related contract between unaffiliated parties, and the formation of the precedent agreement or related contract was not affected by unlawful market activity or unfair dealing as described in (b)(1) of this section.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, a precedent agreement or related contract with a public utility is not arm’s length if the rate paid for transportation on an in-state natural gas pipeline is greater than the recourse tariff rate.

If a precedent agreement or related contract is not arm’s length, the commission shall determine whether the precedent agreement or related contract is just and reasonable using the standards normally applied under AS

42.06.140

. If the commission is reviewing a precedent agreement under (c)(2) of this section, the commission may consider the in-state natural gas pipeline carrier’s approved recourse tariff, including the cost data underlying the tariff. When considering whether to approve a contract as just and reasonable under this subsection, the commission shall consider the consequences of failing to approve the contract.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.330.
Contract carriage certificate.

The owner of an in-state natural gas pipeline subject to this chapter may not engage in the transportation of natural gas or undertake the construction of a natural gas pipeline facility for that purpose, or acquire or operate an in-state natural gas pipeline facility, unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity by the commission authorizing contract carriage is in force with respect to that owner. A certificate shall describe the nature and extent of the authority granted, including, as appropriate for the services involved, a description of the authorized area and scope of operation for the in-state natural gas pipeline facility.

Application for a certificate shall be made in writing to the commission and verified under oath. The commission by regulation shall establish the requirements for the form of the application and the information to be contained in the application. Notice of the application shall be provided to interested parties in the manner provided by regulation.

Within 180 days after receiving an application under this chapter, the commission shall issue a contract carriage certificate authorizing, in whole or in part, the operation, service, construction, or acquisition covered by the application to a qualified applicant if the commission finds that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to do the acts, perform the proposed service, and conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements of the commission, and that the proposed service, operation, construction, extension, or acquisition, to the extent authorized by the certificate, is or will be required by the present or future public convenience and necessity. The commission may, by order, extend the 180-day period for considering an application by the duration of a delay caused by the failure of the applicant to provide additional information reasonably required by the commission. If, within the 180-day period and any extension of the period for considering the application, the commission fails to issue a contract carriage certificate and does not make a finding that the applicant is not fit, willing, and able under this subsection or that the proposed service is not required by public convenience and necessity, the application shall be considered approved and the contract carriage certificate shall take effect immediately.

The commission may attach to a contract carriage certificate reasonable terms and conditions that are consistent with the terms of this chapter and are for the mutual benefit of the in-state natural gas pipeline facility and the public.

Operating authority may not be transferred by sale or lease of the contract carriage certificate or by the sale of substantially all of the stock or assets of a pipeline carrier holding a certificate without prior approval and a finding by the commission that the safe and efficient operation of the natural gas pipeline is not impaired by the transfer. The commission shall summarily approve a transfer not involving a substantial change in ownership.

After receiving a complaint or on its own motion, the commission, after notice and hearing and for good cause shown, may amend, modify, suspend, or revoke, in whole or in part, a certificate. Good cause for amendment, modification, suspension, or revocation of a certificate is shown by

misrepresentation of a material fact in obtaining the certificate;

unauthorized discontinuance or abandonment of all or part of a service that is the subject of the certificate;

wilful failure to comply with the provisions of this chapter or a regulation or order of the commission; or

wilful failure to comply with a term, condition, or limitation of the certificate.

A person holding a certificate issued under this chapter may not abandon or permanently discontinue the use of all or a portion of an in-state natural gas pipeline without permission and approval by the commission, after due notice and hearing and a finding by the commission that continued service is not required by public convenience and necessity. An interested person may file a protest or memorandum of opposition to or in support of discontinuance or abandonment with the commission. The commission may order the temporary suspension of a service or part of a service.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.340.
Filing requirements; recourse tariffs.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall file with the commission a complete recourse tariff containing rates, rules, regulations, terms, and conditions pertaining to service provided under the certificate and copies of all contracts with shippers that in any way affect or relate to the carrier’s rates, tariffs, charges, classifications, rules, regulations, terms, and conditions to service provided under the certificate.

The terms and conditions under which an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier offers its services and facilities to the public shall be governed strictly by the provisions of its currently effective recourse tariff as supplemented and modified by contracts that have been approved by the commission. A legally filed and effective recourse tariff rate, charge, rule, regulation, or condition of service may not be changed except as provided in this chapter. The in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall maintain copies of its recourse tariff on file at its principal business office and at places designated by the commission and make the copies available to and subject to inspection by the general public on demand.

A change in a recourse tariff rate, charge, rule, regulation, or condition of service is not effective until filed under (a) of this section. If more than one recourse tariff rate or charge may reasonably be applied for billing purposes, the recourse tariff rate or charge most advantageous to the shipper shall be used.

The commission may reject the filing of all or part of a recourse tariff that is not consistent with this chapter. A recourse tariff rate or provision so rejected is void.

Initial and revised recourse tariffs shall be filed in the manner provided in AS

42.08.350

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.350.
Initial or revised rates.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier may not establish or place in effect an initial recourse tariff containing rates, charges, rules, regulations, conditions of service, or practices without providing notice to the commission and to the public at least 90 days before establishing or placing in effect the initial recourse tariff. Notice shall be filed with the commission before an open season and by making the recourse tariff provisions available for public inspection. The notice shall plainly indicate the time when the recourse tariff will go into effect and include a supporting cost study. The commission may prescribe additional requirements for the notice and the form in which the notice must be provided. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow initial recourse tariffs to take effect on less than 90 days’ notice under conditions the commission prescribes by order. Submission of a precedent agreement or an associated contract is not subject to this section.

The commission shall review the proposed initial recourse tariff and verify that the proposed terms and conditions of service are not unduly discriminatory. The commission also shall review the supporting cost study provided with an initial recourse tariff filing and verify, taking into consideration the expected risks, that the proposed rate of return on equity is within the range of permissible rates of return as determined by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission in recent decisions related to the construction of natural gas pipelines, that the cost study incorporates a reasonable depreciation methodology and depreciable life, and that the cost study uses a reasonable capital structure. A proposed depreciation methodology, depreciable life, or capital structure is reasonable if it is commonly accepted or used by the commission or the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission.

Upon written complaint or in its own motion, and after reasonable notice, the commission may conduct a hearing to determine whether the initial recourse tariff filed with the commission complies with the requirements in (b) of this section. Pending a hearing the commission may, by order stating the reasons for its action, suspend the operation of the initial recourse tariff for a period not longer than 30 days beyond the time when the initial recourse tariff would otherwise go into effect. An order suspending an initial recourse tariff filing may be vacated if, after investigation, the commission finds that it is in all respects proper. Otherwise, the commission shall hold a hearing on the suspended filing and issue its order, before the end of the suspension period, approving or denying the suspended initial recourse tariff.

Unless a recourse tariff is denied because it includes a proposed term or condition of service that is unduly discriminatory, includes a proposed rate element that does not comply with (b) of this section, or violates a provision of this chapter, the commission shall approve the initial recourse tariff. If the commission does not issue its ruling within the 90-day period, and the period of suspension, if any, the initial recourse tariff filing shall be considered approved.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier may not establish or place in effect a revised rate, charge, rule, regulation, condition of service, or practice contained in a recourse tariff before providing notice to the commission and to the public at least 90 days before taking the action. After construction or an expansion of the pipeline, and at any time that a carrier files for a revised recourse rate, the carrier shall file a supporting cost study. Notice shall be given by filing with the commission and keeping open for public inspection the revised recourse tariff provisions, which shall plainly indicate the changes to be made in the schedules then in force and the time when the changes will go into effect. The commission may prescribe additional means of giving notice. The commission, for good cause shown, may allow changes to take effect on shorter notice under conditions the commission prescribes by order. Submission of a precedent agreement or an associated contract is not subject to this subsection.

The commission shall review a proposed revised recourse tariff in the same manner as the review of a proposed initial recourse tariff under (b) of this section, except that the depreciable life may be adjusted in accordance with the time period between the approval of the recourse tariff and the approval of the revised recourse tariff. The commission shall verify that the carrier is using the same elements that were last approved by the commission. A proposed recourse tariff with a new or revised term or condition of service that is unduly discriminatory shall be denied. The commission also shall deny a revised tariff rate that does not use the previously approved value of the specified rate element, unless the carrier proves that the new value is just and reasonable. If the commission does not issue its ruling within 90 days, the revised recourse tariff filing shall be considered approved.

A person initiating a change in an existing recourse tariff bears the burden of proving the reasonableness of the change. The in-state natural gas pipeline carrier bears the burden of proving the recourse tariff terms and conditions are not unduly discriminatory.

An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier shall provide for separate rates for one or more classes of firm transportation service and for interruptible transportation service in a recourse tariff filed with the commission under (a) of this section. An in-state natural gas pipeline carrier may impose a reservation fee or similar charge for reservation of capacity in an in-state natural gas pipeline as a condition of providing firm transportation service, but may not impose a reservation fee or similar charge for reservation of capacity in an in-state natural gas pipeline for interruptible transportation service.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.370.
Expansion; dispute resolution.

A contract entered into by an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier may provide for expansion unless the expansion would cause the pipeline to be a competing natural gas pipeline project for purposes of AS 43.90.

The recourse tariff or a contract filed by an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier may include a dispute resolution procedure. A dispute resolution procedure shall

provide that notice of a dispute be given to all shippers;

culminate in a process that is determined by an independent third party or panel; and

permit the participation of existing shippers and creditworthy potential shippers that have previously made good-faith requests for firm transportation service; a participant must satisfy the commission’s standard for intervention in an adjudicatory proceeding and demonstrate that the participant has a property, financial, or other significant interest in the dispute.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.380.
Regulatory cost charge.

Each year, a person operating an in-state natural gas pipeline under this chapter shall pay to the commission a regulatory cost charge if the pipeline for which the charge is assessed is subject to this chapter and the commission has taken action on the pipeline or certificate under this chapter during the prior fiscal year. The amount of the regulatory cost charge may not exceed the sum of the following percentages of gross revenue derived from operations in the state:

0.7 percent to fund the operations of the commission; and

0.17 percent to fund operations of the public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

in the Department of Law.

The commission shall by regulation establish a method to determine annually the amount of the regulatory cost charge that will apply to a pipeline regulated under this chapter. If the amount the commission expects to collect under (a) of this section, AS

42.05.254(a)

, and AS

42.06.286(a)

exceeds the authorized budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

, the commission shall, by order, reduce the percentage determined under a regulation adopted under this subsection so that the total amount of the fees collected approximately equals the authorized budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

for the fiscal year.

The commission shall administer the charge imposed under this section. The Department of Revenue shall collect and enforce the charge imposed under this section. The Department of Administration shall identify the amount of the operating budgets of the commission and the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

that lapses into the general fund each year. The legislature may appropriate an amount equal to the lapsed amount to the commission and to the Department of Law public advocacy function under AS

42.04.070(c)

and AS

44.23.020(e)

for operating costs for the next fiscal year. If the legislature does so, the commission shall reduce the total regulatory cost charge collected for that fiscal year by a comparable amount.

The commission may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) necessary to administer this section, including procedures and requirements for reporting information and a requirement for paying the regulatory cost charge in quarterly payments. The Department of Revenue may adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) for investigating the accuracy of filed information and for collecting required payments.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.390.
Effect of chapter on taxes and royalties.

Nothing in this chapter shall alter the calculation of a production tax under AS

43.55.011

—

43.55.180

or the calculation of a royalty due for a lease issued under AS

38.05.180

.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)